Oklahoma, session 2026, SB775.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 27 O.S. 2021, Section 11, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 11. Where a condemnation proceeding is instituted by


any person, agency or other entity to acquire real property for use


as provided in Section 9 of this title and:


1. The final judgment is that the real property cannot be


acquired by condemnation;


2. The proceeding is abandoned; or


3. If the award of the jury exceeds the greater of the award of


the court-appointed commissioners by at least ten percent (10%) or

Req. No. 1211 Page 1


the last written offer of just compensation served on the owner by


the condemning authority no later than forty-five (45) days after


the commissioners’ report has been filed, the owner of any right,


title or interest in such real property may be paid such sum as in


the opinion of the court will reimburse such owner for his


reasonable attorney, appraisal and engineering fees, actually


incurred by written contract because of the condemnation


proceedings. Such determination by the court shall be appealable to


the Supreme Court in the same manner as any other final order. The


final award of such sums will be paid by the person, agency or other


entity which sought to condemn the property.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 66 O.S. 2021, Section 55, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 55. (A) A. The report of the commissioners may be


reviewed by the district court, on written exceptions filed by


either party, in the clerk’s office within thirty (30) days after


the filing of such report; and the court shall make such order


therein as right and justice may require, either by confirmation,


rejection or by ordering a new appraisement on good cause shown; or


either party may within sixty (60) days after the filing of such


report file with the clerk a written demand for a trial by jury, in


which case the amount of damages shall be assessed by a jury, and


the trial shall be conducted and judgment entered in the same manner


as civil actions in the district court. If the party demanding such

Req. No. 1211 Page 2


trial does not recover a verdict more favorable to him such party


than the assessment of the commissioners, all costs in the district


court may be taxed against him such party.


(B) B. Within ten (10) days after the report of commissioners


is filed, the court clerk shall forward to the attorney of record


for the condemnor, the attorney of record for each condemnee, and to


all unrepresented condemnees, a copy of the commissioners’ report


and a notice stating the time limits for filing an exception or


demand for jury trial as specified in paragraph (A) subsection A of


this section. This notice shall be on a form prepared by the Court


Administrator, which shall be approved by the Supreme Court, and


shall be distributed to all clerks of the district court by said the


Court Administrator. If a party has been served by publication, the


clerk shall forward a copy of the report of commissioners and notice


of time limits for filing an exception or demand for jury trial to


the last-known mailing address, if any, and shall cause a copy of


the notice of time limits to be published in one (1) issue of a


newspaper qualified to publish legal notices, as defined in Section


106 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes. After issuing the notices


provided herein, the court clerk shall endorse on the notice form


filed in the case, the date and that a copy of the report together


with the notice was mailed to each party or his or her


attorney of record, or the date the notice was published in


compliance with the provisions hereof.

Req. No. 1211 Page 3


(C) C. The time limits for filing an exception and demand for


jury trial, as prescribed in paragraph (A) subsection A of this


section, shall be calculated from the date the report of the


commissioners is filed in the case. On failure of the court clerk


to give notice within the time prescribed in paragraph (B)


subsection B of this section, the court, on application of any


party, may extend the time for filing an exception to the report or


a demand for trial by jury for a period not to exceed twenty (20)


days from the date the application is heard.


(D) D. Where the party instituting a condemnation proceeding


abandons such proceeding, or where the final judgment is that the


real property cannot be acquired by condemnation or if the award of


the jury exceeds the award of the court-appointed commissioners by


at least ten percent (10%) or exceeds the last written offer of just


compensation served on the owner by the condemning authority no


later than forty-five (45) days after the commissioners’ report has


been filed, whichever is greater, then the owner of any right, title


or interest in the property involved may be paid such sum as in the


opinion of the court will reimburse such owner for his reasonable


attorney, appraisal, engineering, and expert witness fees actually


incurred by written contract because of the condemnation proceeding.


The sum awarded shall be paid by the party instituting the


condemnation proceeding.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

Req. No. 1211 Page 4


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1211 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:43:05 AM





































Req. No. 1211 Page 5